Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-145
Materiel division; terms, defined.

As used in sections 81-145 to 81-162, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Materiel division shall mean the head of the division of the state government charged with the administration of sections 81-145 to 81-162 and 81-1118 to 81-1118.06, which division shall be a part of and subject to the supervision of the office of the Director of Administrative Services;

(2) Personal property shall include all materials, supplies, furniture, equipment, printing, stationery, automotive and road equipment, and other chattels, goods, wares, and merchandise whatsoever;

(3) Using agencies shall mean and include all officers of the state, departments, bureaus, boards, commissions, councils, and institutions receiving legislative appropriations; and

(4) Lease or contract shall mean an agreement entered into by the state or using agency with another party whereby, for a stated consideration, the state or using agency is to receive the personal property or use thereof furnished by the other party.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 1, p. 704;

R.S.1943, § 81-145;

Laws 1963, c. 508, § 1, p. 1616;

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 29, p. 1714;

Laws 1975, LB 359, § 3;

Laws 1975, LB 447, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 5.